Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXIV.] ENVIRONMENTALLY-RELATED ILLNESS AND INJURY

[§321-311] Environmentally-related illness
and injury surveillance. The department of health shall maintain, as it
deems advisable and within available resources, an environmentally-related
human illness and injury surveillance system for conditions determined by the
director to present a threat to public health in order to ascertain the
incidence, distribution, and other epidemiological characteristics of these
illnesses and injuries. [L 1987, c 186, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next